Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5387XC (2) 91 dg/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554J.1 Definitions. 1 For purposes of this chapter: 2 1. âArtificial intelligenceâ means a machine-based system 3 that, for any explicit or implicit objective, infers from the 4 input the system receives to generate output that can influence 5 physical or virtual environments. 6 2. âInputâ means data, directives, or instructions that a 7 user provides to guide the creation of new output. 8 3. âOutputâ means new content that an artificial 9 intelligence generates based on a userâs input in relation to 10 the data used to train the artificial intelligence. âOutputâ 11 includes but is not limited to audio-visual media, images, 12 predictions, recommendations, and text. 13 4. âTrainâ means to expose an artificial intelligence to 14 data for the purpose of making the artificial intelligence 15 recognize patterns, relationships, and structures between data 16 so the artificial intelligence can employ knowledge of those 17 patterns, relationships, and structures to create new output. 18 5. âUserâ means a person that uses artificial intelligence 19 for the purpose of generating output. âUserâ does not include 20 a person giving data to an artificial intelligence for the 21 purpose of training the artificial intelligence. 22 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554J.2 Ownership of output ââ 23 ownership of trained artificial intelligence. 24 1. Subject to subsection 3, a user who provides input to an 25 artificial intelligence shall be the owner of the output the 26 artificial intelligence generates that was based on the userâs 27 input, provided that the output does not infringe on a third 28 partyâs existing copyrights or intellectual property rights. 29 2. Subject to subsection 3, a person that trains an 30 artificial intelligence shall be the owner of artificial 31 intelligence that results from the training if all of the 32 following apply: 33 a. The training data was lawfully acquired and used for 34 training purposes. 35 -1- LSB 5387XC (2) 91 dg/jh 1/ 3 S.F. _____ b. The person has not transferred ownership rights of the 1 resulting artificial intelligence to another person through a 2 contract or agreement. 3 3. If a person uses artificial intelligence as a part of 4 the personâs employment duties, the resulting output or trained 5 artificial intelligence shall be the property of the personâs 6 employer if all of the following apply: 7 a. The personâs use of artificial intelligence is within the 8 scope of the personâs employment. 9 b. The personâs use of the artificial intelligence was 10 conducted under the direction and control of the employer. 11 c. If applicable, the output does not infringe on a third 12 partyâs existing copyrights or intellectual property rights. 13 d. If applicable, the training data was lawfully acquired 14 and used for training purposes. 15 4. This section shall not be construed to grant ownership 16 of property if such a grant of ownership would infringe on a 17 preexisting copyright or other intellectual property right. 18